Maryland, session 2025, SB0310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–501.
The General Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) A statewide Youth Suicide Prevention School Program is essential to
address the continuing problem of youth suicide throughout the State;
(2) The youth suicide problem often exists in combination with other
problems, including drug abuse [and], alcohol use, AND GAMBLING ADDICTION;
(3) A SUICIDE PREVENTION PROGRAM FOR YOUNG PEOPLE MUST
SHOULD PROMOTE RECOGNIZE RECOGNIZING STUDENT BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
ISSUES, RECOGNIZE RECOGNIZING STUDENTS EXPERIENCING TRAUMA OR
VIOLENCE OUT OF SCHOOL, AND REFER REFERRING STUDENTS TO BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH SERVICES;
[(3)] (4) A suicide prevention program for young people must emphasize
a partnership between educational programs at the State and local levels and community
suicide prevention and crisis center agencies;
[(4)] (5) It is of vital importance that a statewide Youth Suicide
Prevention School Program be established with shared responsibility at both the State and
county levels, and that this cooperation shall be a major tool in efforts to achieve the
successful prevention of youth suicide; and
[(5)] (6) County suicide prevention and crisis center agencies along with
local education agencies are best suited for developing and implementing programs for
statewide youth suicide prevention.
7–504.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 246
(a) (1) The Department shall adopt regulations that set eligibility guidelines
for State funding of Youth Suicide Prevention School Programs under this subtitle.
(2) The regulations shall:
(i) Establish procedures for developing local programs, in
cooperation with local education agencies, youth service bureaus, and community mental
health centers; and
(ii) Establish standards and policies for programs to offer:
1. Individual, family, and group counseling related to youth
suicide prevention;
2. Referral, crisis intervention, and information for students,
parents, and school personnel; and
3. Training for school personnel, and others responsible for
counseling or supervising student activities.
(b) A Youth Suicide Prevention School Program established under this subtitle
shall plan, fund, and implement educational programs, which may include any of the
following:
(1) Classroom instruction designed to achieve any of the following
objectives:
(i) Encourage sound decision making and promote ethical
development;
(ii) Increase pupils’ awareness of the relationship between drug and
alcohol use, GAMBLING, and youth suicide;
(iii) Teach pupils to recognize signs of suicidal tendencies, and other
facts about youth suicide;
(iv) Inform pupils of available community youth suicide prevention
services;
(v) Enhance school climate and relationships between teachers,
counselors, and pupils; and
(vi) Further cooperative efforts of school personnel and community
youth suicide prevention program personnel;
– 3 –

Ch. 246 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) School or community based alternative programs outside of the
classroom, including:
(i) Positive peer group programs;
(ii) A 24–hour “hotline” telephone service, staffed by trained
professional counselors;
(iii) Programs to collect data on youth suicide attempts;
(iv) Intervention and follow–up;
(v) Mental health programs to promote mental health awareness
and encourage pupils to seek help as soon as it is needed; and
(vi) Parent education and training programs; and
(3) Teacher training programs.
(c) Any program established under this subtitle shall:
(1) Assist in increasing the awareness, among school personnel and
community leaders, of the incidence of teenage suicide;
(2) Train school personnel in individual and schoolwide strategies for
teenage suicide prevention;
(3) Develop and implement school–based teenage suicide prevention
programs and pilot projects;
(4) Develop and implement school–based pilot mental health programs and
peer–to–peer support to address the needs of students suffering from mental illness; and
(5) Through cooperative efforts, utilize community resources in the
development and implementation of teenage suicide prevention programs under this
subtitle.
(d) The Department may assist local school systems in implementing pilot
peer–to–peer mental health awareness programs.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 4 –